Illinois, session 104th, HB4432.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 510-20.69 and 34-18.62 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.69)7    Sec. 10-20.69. Policy on sexual harassment. Each school 8district must create, maintain, and implement an 9age-appropriate policy on sexual harassment that must be 10posted on the school district's website and, if applicable, 11any other area where policies, rules, and standards of conduct 12are currently posted in each school and must also be included 13in the school district's student code of conduct handbook. The 14policy shall include a method for reporting instances of 15sexual harassment; however, it may not require that a report 16be made in a particular manner for a complaint to be considered 17formal or official for the purposes of initiating an 18investigation.19    Under the policy, a school district employee who is found 20to have engaged in sexual harassment, as defined in the 21Illinois Human Rights Act, shall be subject to disciplinary 22action up to and including termination. 23(Source: P.A. 101-418, eff. 1-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)   HB4432- 2 -LRB104 17292 LNS 30714 b1    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.62)2    Sec. 34-18.62. Policies on discrimination and harassment; 3prevention and response program. 4    (a) The school district must create, maintain, and 5implement an age-appropriate policy on sexual harassment that 6must be posted on the school district's website and, if 7applicable, any other area where policies, rules, and 8standards of conduct are currently posted in each school and 9must also be included in the school district's student code of 10conduct handbook. The policy shall include a method for 11reporting instances of sexual harassment; however, it may not 12require that a report be made in a particular manner for a 13complaint to be considered formal or official for the purposes 14of initiating an investigation. 15    Under the policy, a school district employee who is found 16to have engaged in sexual harassment, as defined in the 17Illinois Human Rights Act, shall be subject to disciplinary 18action up to and including termination. 19    (b) The school district must create, maintain, and 20implement a policy or policies prohibiting discrimination and 21harassment based on race, color, and national origin and 22prohibiting retaliation. Such policy or policies may be 23included as part of a broader anti-harassment or 24anti-discrimination policy provided they are distinguished 25with an appropriate title, heading, or label. The policy or   HB4432- 3 -LRB104 17292 LNS 30714 b1policies adopted under this subsection (b) must comply with 2and be distributed in accordance with subsection (b) of 3Section 22-95 of this Code.4    (c) The school district must establish procedures for 5responding to complaints of discrimination and harassment 6based on race, color, and national origin, and retaliation. 7These procedures must comply with subsection (c) of Section 822-95 of this Code. 9(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24.)